Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Vessels
§ 3313.
Collisions, crashes, and casualties.

The operator of a vessel involved in a collision, crash, or other casualty, so far as he or she can do so without serious danger to his or her own vessel, crew, and passengers, shall render to other individuals affected by the collision, crash, or other casualty such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, crash, or other casualty. Also, he or she shall give his or her name, address, and identification of his or her vessel in writing to any individual injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, crash, or other casualty.

If a collision, crash, or other casualty involving a vessel results in death or injury to an individual or damage to property in excess of $2,000.00, the operator shall file with the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles within 36 hours a full description of the collision, crash, or other casualty, including such information as the Commissioner may, by rule, require.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 90

, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1986;

2021, No. 76

, § 19.

§ 3314.
Transmittal of information.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the Department of Motor Vehicles under subsection 3313(b) of this title shall be transmitted to the official or agency of the United States.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3315.
Water skis and surfboards.

Except as provided in this subsection, an individual shall not operate a vessel on any waters of this State to tow an individual or individuals on water skis, aquaplane, kite skis, wakeboard, kneeboard, or similar device unless the individual being towed is wearing a U.S. Coast Guard-approved personal flotation device and unless there is in the vessel an individual who is at least 12 years of age, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the individual or individuals being towed. Individuals engaged in barefoot waterskiing may elect at their own risk to wear a non-Coast Guard-approved barefoot wetsuit designed specifically for this activity. An observer shall not be required if the vessel is:

a tow boat approved by the American Water Ski Association and equipped with a wide-angle mirror having a viewing surface of at least 48 square inches;

being operated by an individual who is at least 18 years of age; and

being operated within an American Water Ski Association regulation slalom course.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition nor to an individual engaged in an activity authorized under section 3316 of this title.

An individual shall not operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, a surfboard, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, surfboard, or similar device or any individual thereon to approach within 100 feet of an individual swimming or a canoe, rowboat, or other light craft conveying any individual. This subsection does not prohibit necessary mooring or landing or leaving shore.

The Commissioner may designate areas less than 200 feet from the shoreline of a body of water, other than a river, to allow for the operation of a motorboat used for the purpose of towing an individual or individuals on water skis, aquaplane, kite skis, surfboard, or similar device. The Commissioner shall adopt rules to establish criteria governing the designation of such areas and conditions that may be placed on the designated areas. The Commissioner may consider safety, potential environmental damage, the impact on adjacent areas and uses, and any other related concerns.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 23

;

1985, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.);

1989, No. 65

, § 10;

1989, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 240;

2021, No. 20

, § 256.

§ 3316.
Regattas; races; marine parades; tournaments; water skiing events or exhibitions; triathlons.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may authorize the holding of public regattas, motorboat or other vessel races, marine parades, tournaments, water skiing events, exhibitions, or triathlons on any waters of this State and any associated public roads. He or she shall adopt and may, from time to time, amend rules concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and individuals on these vessels, either observers or participants, and of individuals swimming, cycling, or running in or observing an event. Whenever a public regatta, motorboat or other vessel race, marine parade, tournament, water skiing event, exhibition, or triathlon is proposed to be held, the person in charge shall, at least 15 days prior to the event, file an application with the Department of Public Safety for permission to hold the regatta, motorboat or other vessel race, marine parade, tournament, water skiing event, exhibition, or triathlon. A copy of such application shall be sent to the municipality and organized lake association where the event is to be held 15 days in advance of the event to allow for comment. The application shall set forth the date, time, and location where it is proposed to hold the regatta, motorboat or other vessel race, marine parade, tournament, water skiing event, exhibition, or triathlon, and it shall not be conducted without authorization of the Department of Public Safety in writing, except that this provision shall not apply to unscheduled vessel races to which the public has not been invited.

The provisions of this section shall not exempt any person from compliance with applicable federal law or regulation, but nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the securing of a State permit if a permit has been obtained from an authorized agency of the United States.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 90

, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1986;

1989, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. May 24, 2000;

2021, No. 76

, § 20.

§ 3317.
Penalties.

Penalty; $50.00 maximum. A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $50.00 for each violation:

§ 3303
unnumbered boat

§ 3305(a)
unregistered boat

§ 3305(d)
old registered certificate to be returned

§ 3305(e)
compliance with federal motorboat ID system

§ 3305(h)
change of address

§ 3305(i)
incorrect number displayed on boat

§ 3305(j)
temporary registration

§ 3305a(a)
qualified person may operate

§ 3305a(c)
underage operation

§ 3305(b)
operating without boat certificate

§ 3306(a)-(d)
and (g)
lights and equipment

§ 3307a
documented boat validation sticker

§ 3308
boat rental records

§ 3309
muffling device

§ 3311(c)
distance requirements

§ 3311(d)
underwater historic preserve area

§ 3311(e)
overloaded vessel

§ 3311(h)-(i)
authority of law enforcement officer

§ 3312
rules between vessels

§ 3313(b)
failing to file report

§ 3315(a)
water ski observer

§ 3315(c)
improper ski towing

§ 3316
boat races

Penalty or fine; $300.00 or $1,000.00 maximum. A person who violates a requirement under

10 V.S.A. § 1454

shall be subject to enforcement under

10 V.S.A. § 8007

or 8008 or a fine under this chapter, provided that the person shall be assessed a penalty or fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. A person who violates a rule adopted under

10 V.S.A. § 1424

shall be subject to enforcement under 10 V.S.A. chapter 201, provided that the person shall be assessed a penalty of not more than $300.00 for each violation. A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $300.00 for each violation:

§ 3306(e)
marine toilet

§ 3312a
operation of personal watercraft

Fine; $300.00 maximum. A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be imprisoned not more than three months or fined not more than $300.00, or both, for each violation:

§ 3305a(b)
operating privilege suspended

§ 3311(a)
careless and negligent operation

§ 3311(b)
permitting use by intoxicated person

§ 3311(f)
attempting to elude a law enforcement officer

§ 3311(g)
residential vessel prohibited

§ 3313(a)
leaving scene of crash

Boating while intoxicated; privilege suspension. Any person who is convicted of violating section 3323 of this title shall have his or her privilege to operate a vessel, except a nonmotorized canoe and a nonmotorized rowboat, suspended for a period of one year and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title.

Boating while intoxicated; criminal penalty. Any person who violates a provision of section 3323 of this title shall be imprisoned for not more than one year and subject to the following fines:

for a first offense, not less than $200.00 nor more than $750.00;

for a second or subsequent offense, not less than $250.00 nor more than $1,000.00.

Boating while intoxicated; death or serious bodily injury resulting.

If the death of any person results from the violation of section 3323 of this title, the person convicted shall, instead of any other penalty imposed in this section, be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both; but the provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions for manslaughter.
(1) (A) If the death of any person results from the violation of section 3323 of this title, the person convicted shall, instead of any other penalty imposed in this section, be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both; but the provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions for manslaughter.

If the death of more than one person results from a violation of section 3323 of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each decedent.

If serious bodily injury, as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1021(2)

, results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 3323 of this title, the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 15 years, or both.
(2) (A) If serious bodily injury, as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1021(2)

, results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 3323 of this title, the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 15 years, or both.

If serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to more than one person other than the operator from a violation of section 3323 of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each person injured.

Defective, stolen, or fraudulently registered motorboat; registration revocation or suspension. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or his or her authorized agent may suspend or revoke the registration of any motorboat registered in this State and repossess the number and certificate to it, when he or she is satisfied that:

a motorboat has been stolen and that the registrant has not legal title; or

a motorboat is in such poor mechanical or structural condition as to make it unseaworthy; or

a motorboat is operated without proper equipment after the owner has been notified to procure and use such equipment as is required by law or Department rules; or

the owner of a motorboat has perpetrated some fraud upon the Department of Motor Vehicles.

More than two violations; education program required. Any person convicted of more than two boating violations concerning the operation of, or safety equipment on, a vessel within a two-year period shall, in addition to penalties provided for in this section, have his or her privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this State suspended until the person has successfully completed the boating safety education program provided in section 3305b of this title. A person shall also be required to complete the program if convicted of careless or negligent operation or of operation under the influence of alcohol or drugs. The requirements of this subsection apply regardless of whether a person has completed the education program one or more times.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 90

, § 7, eff. May 30, 1985;

1989, No. 65

, § 11;

1999, No. 42

, § 3, eff. May 25, 1999;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 70, eff. June 8, 2004;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 30

, § 3;

2015, No. 61

, § 11, eff. June 17, 2015;

2017, No. 67

, § 6, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 71

, § 29, eff. June 8, 2017;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 241.

§ 3318.
Administration and enforcement.

The administration of the provisions of this chapter, as they pertain to the registration and numbering of vessels and the suspension of the privilege to operate vessels, shall be the responsibility of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

This subchapter and rules adopted under this subchapter shall be printed in booklet form and made available to the public by the Department of Public Safety.

The provisions of this subchapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter shall be enforced by law enforcement officers as defined in section 3302 of this title in accordance with the provisions of 4 V.S.A. chapter 29. Law enforcement officers as defined in section 3302 of this title may also enforce the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 1454

and the rules adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 1424

in accordance with the requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapter 50.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 90

, § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 1986;

1989, No. 65

, § 12;

1999, No. 42

, § 4, eff. May 25, 1999;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2015, No. 61

, § 12, eff. June 17, 2015;

2017, No. 71

, § 20;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 242.

§ 3319.
Fees collected; special fund.

There is hereby established a special fund to be known as the Motorboat Registration Fund for the purposes of ensuring that the fees and penalties collected under this subchapter are utilized in the protection and maintenance of the State’s water resources. Any interest earned on the monies in this Fund will be deposited in the General Fund.

The fees and penalties collected under the provisions of this subchapter shall be deposited in the Motorboat Registration Fund and shall be allocated as follows:

10 percent to the Department of Public Safety, to be used for enforcement of this subchapter and implementation of a boating safety education program.

34 percent to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, to be used to match federal funds; for upgrading and expanding boating access areas and facilities located at those areas; for developing and constructing new boating access areas; and for facilitating or establishing and maintaining pump out stations, which may be, in the discretion of the Commissioner, constructed or operated either by the Department or on a contractual basis by a private person or entity. Users shall be charged reasonable and appropriate fees.

17 percent to the Department of Environmental Conservation for the purpose of aquatic nuisance control pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 50.

Seven percent to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the purpose of mosquito control pursuant to 6 V.S.A. chapter 85.

20 percent to the Department of Environmental Conservation for the purpose of an Aquatic Nuisance Control Grant Program pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 50.

12 percent to the Transportation Fund.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1989, No. 65

, § 13;

1989, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1993, No. 52

, § 3, eff. July 1, 1994;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 57;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 46

, § 7, eff. July 1, 2010;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 50.

§ 3320.
Motorboats on Dufresne Dam waters prohibited.

The use and operation of motorboats on the waters impounded by the Dufresne Dam, so-called, on the Battenkill River in the Town of Manchester is prohibited.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall post notice of this section conspicuously at the boat launching areas at the Dufresne Dam impoundment.

A person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $20.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2021, No. 76

, § 21.

§ 3321.
Motorboats in South Pond prohibited.

The use and operation of motorboats on the waters of South Pond in the Town of Marlboro is prohibited.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall post notice of this section conspicuously at the boat launching areas at the South Pond impoundment.

A person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $20.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2021, No. 76

, § 21.

§ 3322.
Proof of payment of tax.

No license, permit, registration, validation, or similar authorization to own or operate any vessel shall be issued under this chapter until proof of payment of or exemption from the tax imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 233 has been established in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Taxes.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3323.
Operating under the influence of alcohol or drugs; B.W.I.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State while:

there is 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in his or her blood, as shown by analysis of his or her breath or blood; or

under the influence of alcohol; or

under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree that renders the person incapable of operating safely.

As used in this section, “alcohol” includes “alcohol,” “malt beverages,” “spirits,” “fortified wines,” and “vinous beverages” as defined in

7 V.S.A. § 2

, and any beverage or liquid containing any of them.

A person who is a habitual user of or under the influence of any narcotic drug or who is under the influence of any other drug, substance, or inhalant other than alcohol to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely operating a vessel may not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of a vessel. The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this State shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

For the purposes of this section, “drug” means a regulated drug as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 4201

.

A person may not be convicted of more than one violation of subsection (a) of this section arising out of the same incident.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 65

, § 14; amended

1997, No. 57

, § 3;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2017, No. 83

, § 155.

§ 3323a.
Persons under 21; years of age; alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more.

A person under the age of 21 who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more, commits a civil traffic violation subject to the jurisdiction of the Judicial Bureau and subject to the following sanctions:

For a first violation, the person’s privilege to operate a vessel, except a nonmotorized canoe and a nonmotorized rowboat, on the waters of this State shall be suspended for six months and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title.

For a second or subsequent violation, the person’s privilege to operate a vessel, except a nonmotorized canoe and a nonmotorized rowboat, on the waters of this State shall be suspended until the person reaches the age of 21 or for one year, whichever is longer, and complies with section 1209a of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (a) of this section to the contrary, a person’s privilege to operate that has been suspended under this section shall not be reinstated until the Commissioner has received satisfactory evidence that the provider of the therapy program has been paid in full.

If a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is violating this section, the officer may request the person to submit to a breath test using a preliminary screening device approved by the Commissioner of Health. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in sections 1202 and 1203 of this title:

the results of the test shall be admissible evidence in a proceeding under this section; and

there shall be no statutory right to counsel prior to the administration of the test.

A refusal to submit to a breath test shall be considered a violation of this section.

In a proceeding under this section, if there was at any time within two hours of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person’s alcohol concentration was 0.02 or more at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control.

The alcohol program required under this section shall be administered by the Department of Health’s Division of Substance Use Programs and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of operators under 21 years of age.

A charge of violating this section shall not bar prosecution for any crime, including a prosecution under section 3323 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 57

, § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; amended

1997, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2021, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3324.
Implied consent.

Any person who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State is deemed to have given consent to the taking of more than one sample of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of his or her blood.
The samples shall be taken and the tests administered and analyzed consistently with the provisions of sections 1202 and 1203 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 65

, § 14.

§ 3325.
Permissive inferences.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by a person while operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State, the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath at the time alleged as shown by analysis of the person’s blood or breath shall give rise to the following permissive inferences or presumptions:

If there was at that time 0.05 percent or less by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath, it shall be presumed that the person was not under the influence of alcohol.

If there was at that time in excess of 0.05 percent but less than 0.08 percent by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath, such fact shall not give rise to any presumption or permissive inference that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but such fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of alcohol.

If there was at that time 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath, as shown by analysis of the person’s blood or breath, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of section 3323 of this title.

If there was at any time within two hours of the alleged offense, 0.10 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath as shown by analysis of the person’s blood or breath, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of subdivision 3323(a)(2) or (3) of this title.

Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be based upon milligrams of alcohol per one hundred cubic centimeters of blood.

The foregoing provisions shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person was under the influence of alcohol, nor shall they be construed as requiring that evidence of the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath must be preserved.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 65

, § 14; amended

1997, No. 57

, § 5;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 3326.
Refusals; sanctions.

Refusals. If the person refuses to submit to an evidentiary test it shall not be given, but the refusal may be introduced as evidence in a criminal proceeding. If the person is charged with a violation of this subchapter, the court at the arraignment or as soon thereafter as is practicable shall hold a summary hearing, and take evidence relating to the reasonableness of the officer’s belief that the defendant was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State while under the influence of alcohol or other drugs, or both.

Penalty; first refusal. Upon a finding by the court that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the defendant was so operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vessel on the waters of this State, the court shall impose a civil penalty of not more than $750.00. In addition, the person’s privilege to operate a vessel, except a nonmotorized canoe and a nonmotorized rowboat, on the waters of this State shall be suspended for a period of one year and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title.

Second occurrence after five years. Upon a second refusal to submit to testing and upon a finding by the court under subsection (a) of this section, if the second offense occurs more than five years after the date of the first offense for which a refusal was given, the court shall impose the same penalty and suspension as for a first refusal under this section.

Second occurrence within five years. Upon a second refusal to submit to testing and upon a finding by the court under subsection (a) of this section, if the offense occurred within five years of the date of the offense for which there was a first refusal by that person, and upon final determination of an appeal, the court shall impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00. In addition, the person’s privilege to operate a vessel, except a nonmotorized canoe and a nonmotorized rowboat, on the waters of this State shall be suspended for a period of two years and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 65

, § 14; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 3327.
Responsibility to follow lawful order of law enforcement officer.

A person while operating or in charge of a vessel shall, upon request by a law enforcement officer who reasonably suspects that the person has committed or is committing a violation of this subchapter, give his or her name, date of birth, and address and the name and address of the owner of the vessel.

The operator of the vessel shall identify himself or herself upon request from a law enforcement officer and produce the registration certificate for the vessel if required. A person operating a vessel shall promptly and carefully stop when signaled to stop by a law enforcement officer wearing insignia that identifies the officer.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $300.00.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $250.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 30

, § 4.